Illinois, session 104th, SB305.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Renewable Energy Facilities Agricultural 5Impact Mitigation Act is amended by changing Section 1 as 6follows: 7    (505 ILCS 147/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Renewable Energy Facilities Agricultural Impact Mitigation 10Act.11(Source: P.A. 99-132, eff. 7-24-15; 100-598, eff. 6-29-18.)